Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.060

Departmental rules and regulations.

The director of each department may prescribe rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the government of his or her department, the conduct of its subordinate officers and employees, the disposition and performance of its business, and the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, books, documents, and property pertaining thereto.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5061; 1965 c 8 s 43.17.060. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 19; RRS s 10777.]